frontend/src/assets/hunspell/rm-surmiran/rm-surmiran.dic
Genevrin/RT
Puter/RT
a purtada/T
absolvents/RT
accordescha/PQT
accreditainsa/PT
activav'la/PT
admunescha/PQT
adoss'la/PT
advocazeias/RT
agradend/PT
agradescha/PQT
alarmagn/PT
amballa/PQT
ambartg/PT
ambassadas/RT
ambrugliarossas/PT
amplifitgia/PT
anatomisav'la/PT
anatomisescha/PQT
andultschiva/PT
anemia/RT
anetgadads/RT
anfladescha/PQT
angrevagess'la/PT
anrodada/PT
anrodla/PQT
ansulagn/PT
antisemitissem/RT
anvedrarossast/PT
anveisa/PQT
anvisavigl/PT
arginarossas/PT
aristocrazeia/RT
arrundescha/PQT
ascragevan/PT
assessoura/RT
associia/PRT
autostopist/RT
aviess/PT
avise/PQT
baitaroia/PT
ballapugn/RT
barvogna/RT
basignivast/PT
bastardond/PT
baterle/PQT
biagem/RT
blamavan/PT
blasfemaron/PT
boier/RT
botanisescha/PQT
bugnessa/PT
bullas/RT
butschigns/RT
calmativs/RT
camuflescha/PQT
canterl'la/PT
canunga/RT
cardiogram/RT
carpungs/RT
caschuno/PT
cataloghisescha/PQT
cazops/RT
certificat da dabet/T
circumdavigl/PT
civilists/RT
climatisescha/PQT
codifitgez/PT
coitadas/PT
collectour/RT
communitgescha/PQT
concepissa/PT
condensessa/PT
condolientschas/RT
congiunscharoia/PT
conquiste/PQT
consuments/RT
contactaronigl/PT
contanscheida/PT
conversescha/PQT
cortusa/RT
costumescha/PQT
credibla/T
cromaticas/RT
crouscha/PQT
cuclagiaronsa/PT
cumandantas/RT
cumbattiv/T
cumpativigl/PT
cumpilescha/PQT
cuntels/RT
cunterfaschainsa/PT
cunterfirmaron/PT
cuppa/PQRT
curts/RT
cuschidressans/PT
da bovs/T
debite/PQT
debitessans/PT
decentralisava/PT
decoraziuns/RT
defurmeschas/PT
delectescha/PQT
denigraro'l/PT
depauperisess'la/PT
derudle/PQT
deserts/RT
desideraronigl/PT
destruiz/PT
diavle/PQT
diavleschast/PT
dimonas/RT
discussiunavigl/PT
disdetga/PRT
disgraztge/PQT
distinguaronsa/PT
diverteider/RT
doctragess'la/PT
domiciliescha/PQT
dratgez/PT
durmeidettas/RT
edutgesch/PT
eiacularon/PT
eisa/PQT
epidermis/RT
escalada/PT
esitavast/PT
exagere/PQT
examinadra/RT
exhumarossas/PT
exorbitantas/T
extende/PQT
extrapolos/PT
fallondra/RT
fastizaronsa/PT
feils/RT
festinessast/PT
festive/PQT
filunza-louf/RT
fittess'la/PT
flanchez/PT
fluri/PQT
fond/RT
fraternisessa/PT
frequentagn/PT
frivolitad/RT
funde/PQT
furmavans/PT
galdeidras/RT
gas toxic/T
gest/RT
ghiglia/PT
ghisigne/PQT
giuradras/RT
giurists/RT
glischantess'la/PT
gradaziun/RT
gratulescha/PQT
gueriva/PT
guids/RT
gustav'la/PT
humus/RT
immigraziun/RT
immigre/PQT
impestessa'l/PT
incendiaris/RT
inculpess/PT
incumbensescha/PQT
indemniseschan/PT
inquisitouras/RT
inscenesch/PT
instituziunalisar/T
instituziunalise/PQT
interessez/PT
intschess/RT
inventarise/PQT
investoura/RT
invochess'la/PT
lamentaschungs/RT
lepra/RT
lesbicas/T
liagez/PT
lie/PQT
logaritmus/RT
machegian/PT
magias/RT
magnucca/RT
malgartegia/PQT
manadras/RT
manipule/PQT
mantgaronsa/PT
marveglias/RT
maseira/PQRT
masterlez/PT
meidalengia/RT
melets/RT
micrometers/RT
miritess/PT
mobigliv'la/PT
mobilise/PQT
mogn/PRT
mulars/RT
multiplitgez/PT
mustgagessast/PT
mutive/PQT
nattageda/PRT
necessitainsa/PT
normarossas/PT
notiztgas/RT
nuschi/PQT
obedissigl/PT
odour/RT
omettan/PT
orientaron/PT
orvs/RT
oxide/PQT
palesar/T
panets/RT
panse/PQT
parti/PQRT
partischantadads/RT
past d'unfrenda/T
pastorava'l/PT
pedagog/RT
percorscha/PQT
perennaron/PT
perfurava'l/PT
perschuneia/RT
pilotescha/PQT
pirats/RT
pisesch/PT
planivaronigl/PT
plazzas/PRT
polarise/PQT
polemiseschan/PT
portacletgs/RT
prelevaziun/RT
presanti/PQT
presantiss/PT
preservainsa/PT
producentas/RT
programme/PQT
projecteschast/PT
provisours/RT
provotgessa'l/PT
punganescha/PQT
punsals/RT
purtaders/RT
radiogram/RT
radunaro'la/PT
radunaron/PT
raffe/PQT
raziunalise/PQT
reactour/RT
reagess'la/PT
recargairossas/PT
recumpense/PQT
refilavast/PT
regresseschast/PT
regurde/PQT
renoveschan/PT
repose/PQT
resentimaint/RT
resocialisesch/PT
restructuressa'l/PT
resunga/PQT
rimessigl/PT
rinforza/PQT
rituals/RT
rughel/PRT
sa smular/T
sae/PQT
salvav'la/PT
sarar cugl cadenatsch/T
sbance/PQT
sbavadeiras/RT
sbuatscha'l/PT
sbuava'l/PT
sbure/PQT
scaveglia/PQT
schals/RT
schampunez/PT
schemgess'la/PT
schlitta/PQRT
schluppignaronigl/PT
schoz/RT
sclera/PQT
scolarisescha/PQT
scuda'l/PT
scundrezza/PQT
scurrantava/PT
sdratschliron/PT
secretescha/PQT
sentimentalitad/RT
sfevless/PT
sfiglivigl/PT
sfimante/PQT
sgatta/PQT
sglischier giu/T
sgregn/PRT
simpatisescha/PQT
ski/RT
smaglian/PT
smatgaro/PT
sminuescha/PQT
sofissems/RT
sotsigne/PQT
spacheteschas/PT
spatleidas/T
spelatscha/PQT
spezialas/RT
splideschas/PT
spostigl/PT
spoula/PQT
statalise/PQT
statgedas/PRT
stebgian/PT
stgompamaints/RT
stilive/PQT
straccadad/RT
strubast/PT
stuli/PQT
subeschast/PT
sulve/PQT
sungas/PRT
surcargessa'l/PT
surdebitaziuns/RT
surlavoura/PQT
surscaldessa'l/PT
surstgimos/PT
surtaxescha/PQT
svirgine/PQT
svistgissa'l/PT
svungagiainsa/PT
taschainta/PQT
tatgariels/RT
tatuav'la/PT
terminaro/PT
tgavalas/RT
tgavalgescha/PQT
tgavals/RT
toxicomans/RT
trafeila/PQT
tralascharo/PT
transatlantic/RT
travistgi/PQT
traxs/RT
tschalattaro/PT
tschincle/PQT
tschintadas/PT
tschitg/RT
tute/PQT
tutgaronsa/PT
uffezi da posta/T
vadretg/RT
vane/PQT
vanetta/RT
verdagea/PT
vigliurdas/RT
virginalitad/RT
vise/PQT
ziplessa/PT
zoppetg'la/PT
zuffanescha/PQT
